Utah statutes.
63G-6-208 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Rules and regulations of policy board and building board.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the policy board shall make rules governing state procurement by complying with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, the Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(b) Except for rules made under Subsection (1)(c), the procurement rules adopted by the policy board under this section apply to all local public procurement units unless the local public procurement unit's legislative body has adopted separate rules governing procurement.

(c)  The rules shall include provisions consistent with federal contract prohibition provisions of the Sudan Accountability and Divestment Act of 2007 (Pub. L. No. 110-174) that prohibit a state agency from contracting with a person doing business in Sudan.

(2)  The State Building Board rules governing procurement of construction, architect-engineer services, and leases apply to the procurement of construction, architect-engineer services, and leases of real property by the Division of Facilities Construction and Management.

(3)  The board shall make a report by July 1 of each year to an appropriate legislative interim committee designated by the Legislative Management Committee created under Section 36-12-6 on the establishment, implementation, and enforcement of the rules made under Subsection (1)(c).

